District of Columbia statutes.
2-217.01

Repealed

Definitions.

Repealed.

Apr. 27, 1999, D.C. Law 12-268, § 2, 46 DCR 969
Oct. 14, 1999, D.C. Law 13-49, § 13(a), 46 DCR 5153
Oct. 4, 2000, D.C. Law 13-169, § 2(a), 47 DCR 5846
Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 2382(b), 52 DCR 7503
1981 Ed., § 1-1153.1.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Blanket Order Blitz Increased Opportunity for Local, Small, and Disadvantaged Business Enterprises Temporary Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Law 13-77, April 5, 2000, law notification 47 DCR 2634).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of the Equal Opportunity for Local, Small, or Disadvantaged Business Enterprises Temporary Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Law 13-216, April 3, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 3458).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of the Local, Small, and Disadvantaged Business Enterprises Certification Temporary Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Law 16-14, July 22, 2005, law notification 52 DCR 7167).
For temporary addition of subchapter II-B 1981 Ed., see §§ 2-9 of the Equal Opportunity for Local, Small, and Disadvantaged Business Enterprises Second Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-221, December 29, 1997, 44 DCR 103) and §§ 2-8 and § 10 of the Equal Opportunity for Local, Small, and Disadvantaged Business Enterprises Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-565, January 12, 1999, 46 DCR 700).
For temporary (90-day) addition of subchapter II-B 1981 Ed., see §§ 2 to 7 and 10 of the Equal Opportunity for Local, Small, and Disadvantaged Business Enterprises Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-39, March 22, 1999, 46 DCR 3019).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of the Increased Opportunity for Local, Small, and Disadvantaged Business Enterprises Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-136, August 4, 1999, 46 DCR 6794).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of the Blanket Order Blitz Increased Opportunity for Local, Small, and Disadvantaged Business Enterprises Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-184, November 2, 1999, 46 DCR 9745).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of the Blanket Order Blitz Increased Opportunity for Local, Small, and Disadvantaged Business Enterprises Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-278, March 7, 2000, 47 DCR 2019).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of the Equal Opportunity for Local, Small, or Disadvantaged Business Enterprises Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-415, August 14, 2000, 47 DCR 7296).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of Local, Small, and Disadvantaged Business Enterprises Certification Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-72, April 25, 2005, 52 DCR 4577).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 2382(b), (c) of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).

Policy on the Participation of Local, Small, & Disadvantaged business Enterprises in Executive Branch Procurements, see Mayor’s Order 2003-14, January 29, 2003 ( 50 DCR 1784).

Section 2382(c) of D.C. Law 16-33 provided: “(c) An order, rule, or regulation in effect under a law repealed by this section shall remain in effect under the corresponding provision enacted by this subtitle subtitle N of title II, §§ 2301 to 2391, of D.C. Law 16-33 until repealed, amended, or superseded.”.